Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.20.478

Center for human rights.

A University of Washington center for human rights is created. The mission of the center is to expand opportunities for Washington residents to receive a world-class education in human rights, generate research data and expert knowledge to enhance public and private policymaking, and become an academic center for human rights teaching and research in the nation. The center shall align with the founding principles and philosophies of the United States of America and engage faculty, staff, and students in service to enhance the promise of life and liberty as outlined in the Preamble of the United States Constitution. Key substantive issues for the center include: The rights of all persons to security against violence; the rights of immigrants, native Americans, and ethnic or religious minorities; human rights and the environment; health as a human right; human rights and trade; the human rights of working people; and women's rights as human rights. State funds may not be used to support the center for human rights created in this section.

[ 2012 c 229 s 807; 2009 c 465 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 229 ss 101, 117, 401, 402, 501 through 594, 601 through 609, 701 through 708, 801 through 821, 902, and 904: See note following RCW 28B.77.005.